Illinois, session 104th, HB4597.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/6)  (from Ch. 116, par. 206)7    Sec. 6. Authority to charge fees. 8    (a) When a person requests a copy of a record maintained in 9an electronic format, the public body shall furnish it in the 10electronic format specified by the requester, if feasible. If 11it is not feasible to furnish the public records in the 12specified electronic format, then the public body shall 13furnish it in the format in which it is maintained by the 14public body, or in paper format at the option of the requester. 15A public body may charge the requester for the actual cost of 16purchasing the recording medium, whether disc, diskette, tape, 17or other medium. If a request is not a request for a commercial 18purpose or a voluminous request, a public body may not charge 19the requester for the costs of any search for and review of the 20records or other personnel costs associated with reproducing 21the records. Except to the extent that the General Assembly 22expressly provides, statutory fees applicable to copies of 23public records when furnished in a paper format shall not be   HB4597- 2 -LRB104 17930 BDA 31367 b1applicable to those records when furnished in an electronic 2format. 3    (a-5) If a voluminous request is for electronic records 4and those records are not in a portable document format (PDF), 5the public body may charge up to $20 for not more than 2 6megabytes of data, up to $40 for more than 2 but not more than 74 megabytes of data, and up to $100 for more than 4 megabytes 8of data. If a voluminous request is for electronic records and 9those records are in a portable document format, the public 10body may charge up to $20 for not more than 80 megabytes of 11data, up to $40 for more than 80 megabytes but not more than 12160 megabytes of data, and up to $100 for more than 160 13megabytes of data. If the responsive electronic records are in 14both a portable document format and not in a portable document 15format, the public body may separate the fees and charge the 16requester under both fee scales.17    If a public body imposes a fee pursuant to this subsection 18(a-5), it must provide the requester with an accounting of all 19fees, costs, and personnel hours in connection with the 20request for public records. 21    (b) Except when a fee is otherwise fixed by statute, each 22public body may charge fees reasonably calculated to reimburse 23its actual cost for reproducing and certifying public records 24and for the use, by any person, of the equipment of the public 25body to copy records. No fees shall be charged for the first 50 26pages of black and white, letter or legal sized copies   HB4597- 3 -LRB104 17930 BDA 31367 b1requested by a requester. The fee for black and white, letter 2or legal sized copies shall not exceed 15 cents per page. If a 3public body provides copies in color or in a size other than 4letter or legal, the public body may not charge more than its 5actual cost for reproducing the records. In calculating its 6actual cost for reproducing records or for the use of the 7equipment of the public body to reproduce records, a public 8body shall not include the costs of any search for and review 9of the records or other personnel costs associated with 10reproducing the records, except for commercial requests as 11provided in subsection (f) of this Section. Such fees shall be 12imposed according to a standard scale of fees, established and 13made public by the body imposing them. The cost for certifying 14a record shall not exceed $1. 15    (c) Documents shall be furnished without charge or at a 16reduced charge, as determined by the public body, if the 17person requesting the documents states the specific purpose 18for the request and indicates that a waiver or reduction of the 19fee is in the public interest. Waiver or reduction of the fee 20is in the public interest if the principal purpose of the 21request is to access and disseminate information regarding the 22health, safety and welfare or the legal rights of the general 23public and is not for the principal purpose of personal or 24commercial benefit. For purposes of this subsection, 25"commercial benefit" shall not apply to requests made by news 26media when the principal purpose of the request is to access   HB4597- 4 -LRB104 17930 BDA 31367 b1and disseminate information regarding the health, safety, and 2welfare or the legal rights of the general public. In setting 3the amount of the waiver or reduction, the public body may take 4into consideration the amount of materials requested and the 5cost of copying them.6    (d) The imposition of a fee not consistent with 7subsections (6)(a) and (b) of this Act constitutes a denial of 8access to public records for the purposes of judicial review.9    (e) The fee for each abstract of a driver's record shall be 10as provided in Section 6-118 of "The Illinois Vehicle Code", 11approved September 29, 1969, as amended, whether furnished as 12a paper copy or as an electronic copy.13    (f) A public body may charge up to $10 for each hour spent 14by personnel in searching for and retrieving a requested 15record or examining the record for necessary redactions. No 16fees shall be charged for the first 8 hours spent by personnel 17in searching for or retrieving a requested record. A public 18body may charge the actual cost of retrieving and transporting 19public records from an off-site storage facility when the 20public records are maintained by a third-party storage company 21under contract with the public body. If a public body imposes a 22fee pursuant to this subsection (f), it must provide the 23requester with an accounting of all fees, costs, and personnel 24hours in connection with the request for public records. The 25provisions of this subsection (f) apply only to commercial 26requests.  HB4597- 5 -LRB104 17930 BDA 31367 b1    (g) A public body may impose a fee upon a requester for the 2actual, necessary, and direct cost of redacting, whether by 3pixelization or other means, recorded audio or video content 4recordings made under the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 5Camera Act to the extent redaction is necessary to comply with 6the law. When calculating the fee imposed under this 7subsection, the rate for an actual, necessary, and direct 8charge for staff time spent redacting shall be based on the pay 9rate of the public body's lowest paid employee capable of 10performing the task. A public body may not impose a fee under 11this subsection for a request for records containing audio or 12video content if:13        (1) the requester:14            (A) is an individual that provides written 15        certification to the public body that the requester 16        will not use the audio or video content for financial 17        gain, except for seeking an award of damages in a civil 18        action; and19            (B) during the calendar year in which the public 20        body receives the request, has not made more than 10 21        requests, including the current request but not 22        including any request that satisfied the requirements 23        of paragraph (2) or (3), to the public body for records 24        containing audio or video content;25        (2) the requester is:26            (A) directly involved in the events depicted on   HB4597- 6 -LRB104 17930 BDA 31367 b1        the audio or video content;2            (B) an attorney representing an individual 3        directly involved in the events depicted on the audio 4        or video content; or5            (C) the parent or guardian of an individual under 6        the age of 18 who is depicted on the audio or video 7        recording;8        (3) the audio or video content depicts an 9    officer-involved shooting, as defined in Section 1-30 of 10    the Police and Community Relations Improvement Act; or11        (4) the public body did not provide the requester, in 12    writing, with an estimate of the amount of the fee to be 13    charged before fulfilling the request.14    (h) If an individual provides a false certification under 15subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (g), then the 16individual shall be subject to a fine of $10,000 for each 17violation.18(Source: P.A. 97-579, eff. 8-26-11; 98-1129, eff. 12-3-14.)